Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1414SV (1) 91 sc/ns S.F. 457 Section 1. Section 9E.3, subsection 1, paragraphs e and f, 1 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 e. The residential address of the eligible person, 3 disclosure of which could lead to an increased risk of domestic 4 abuse, domestic abuse assault, sexual abuse, assault, stalking, 5 or human trafficking. If the eligible personâs residential 6 address is a shelter known to the program, the applicant may 7 provide the shelterâs name and other contact information in 8 lieu of the shelterâs physical address. 9 f. If mail cannot be delivered to the residential address of 10 the eligible person, the address to which mail can be sent to 11 the eligible person. If the eligible personâs mailing address 12 is a shelter known to the program, the applicant may provide 13 the shelterâs name and other contact information in lieu of the 14 shelterâs physical address. 15 Sec. 2. Section 9E.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 2. The secretary shall cancel a program participantâs 18 certification if the for any of the following reasons: 19 a. The program participantâs application contains false 20 information. 21 b. The secretary receives information from a reliable source 22 that the program participant has died. 23 c. A program participant with legal documentation from a 24 reliable source requests an adult member of a household to be 25 removed from the program. An adult member of a household whose 26 program certification is canceled is eligible to rejoin the 27 program. 28 Sec. 3. Section 9E.5, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 3. The secretary shall forward all mail sent to the 31 designated address to the program participant. At the request 32 of the program participant, the secretary may hold the program 33 participantâs mail for up to thirty days. 34 Sec. 4. Section 9E.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended by 35 -1- LSB 1414SV (1) 91 sc/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 457 adding the following new paragraph: 1 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. The state commissioner of elections 2 or a county commissioner of elections shall cancel a program 3 participantâs voter registration upon becoming aware of the 4 program participantâs voter registration in another state. 5 Sec. 5. Section 9E.6, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025, 6 is amended to read as follows: 7 a. A program participant who is otherwise eligible to 8 vote may annually register with the state commissioner of 9 elections as an absentee voter for the length of a program 10 participantâs certification period . As soon as practicable 11 before each election, the state commissioner of elections shall 12 determine the precinct in which the residential address of the 13 program participant is located and shall request and receive 14 from the county commissioner of elections the ballot for that 15 precinct and shall forward the absentee ballot to the program 16 participant with the other materials for absentee balloting as 17 required of the county commissioner of elections by section 18 53.8 . 19